Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
TUITION ASSISTANCE

23-3.3-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Dependent" means:

Any natural child born or conceived before the period of time either of said child's parents served as a prisoner of war, was declared a person missing in action, served on state active duty or authorized training duty as a Colorado national guardsman, or was permanently disabled or killed while acting to preserve the public peace, health, and safety in the capacity of police officer, sheriff, or other law enforcement officer or firefighter;

Any child lawfully adopted, or for which formal adoption procedures were commenced, prior to the time either of said child's adoptive parents served as a prisoner of war, was declared a person missing in action, served on state active duty or authorized training duty as a Colorado national guardsman, or was permanently disabled or killed while acting to preserve the public peace, health, and safety in the capacity of police officer, sheriff, or other law enforcement officer or firefighter; or

Any child in the legal custody of or whose parent has parental responsibilities with respect to such child or for which proceedings for custody or the allocation of parental responsibilities were initiated by either of said child's parents prior to the time such parent served as a prisoner of war, was declared missing in action, served on state active duty or authorized training duty as a Colorado national guardsman, or was permanently disabled or killed while acting to preserve the public peace, health, and safety in the capacity of police officer, sheriff, or other law enforcement officer or firefighter.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 825, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1014, § 21, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1410, § 75, effective February 1, 1999.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 23-5-111 (1) and 23-5-111.5 (1) as they existed prior to 1979.

23-3.3-202. Program funding.

Out of any money provided for the financial assistance program authorized by section 23-3.3-102, the commission shall first provide tuition assistance to individuals who qualify under the provisions of this part 2.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 826, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1155, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1290), ch. 242, p. 1095, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-174), ch. 10, p. 32, § 1, effective March 1.

23-3.3-203. Veterans with service after August 5, 1964. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 826, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 789, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1797, § 11, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 23-1-113 as it existed prior to its repeal in 1979 and prior to the repeal and reenactment of article 1 of this title in 1985.

23-3.3-204. Dependents of prisoners of war and military personnel missing in action.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "prisoner of war" or "person missing in action" means any person who was a resident of the state of Colorado at the time such person entered the United States armed forces and who, while serving in said United States armed forces, has been declared to be a prisoner of war or a person missing in action, as established by the secretary of defense of the United States.

Any dependent of a prisoner of war or a person missing in action, upon being accepted for enrollment into any institution, shall be permitted to pursue studies leading toward a bachelor's degree or a certificate of completion, free of tuition, for so long as said dependent achieves and maintains standards as set by the institution for its students generally, but said benefits shall not be extended beyond twelve academic quarters or eight academic semesters, as the case may be. Such dependents pursuing studies at an institution that is not a state institution shall be eligible for assistance not to exceed the average cost of undergraduate instruction calculated for a full-time equivalent student at a comparable state institution for the previous year. The institution or the commission shall provide tuition assistance to such qualified students from appropriated student financial assistance funds.

Any person qualifying as a dependent under this section shall not be deprived of the benefits provided by this section because of the return of a parent or the reported death of a parent.

A qualified dependent may receive benefits pursuant to this section prior to receiving federal educational benefits available to dependents pursuant to the federal "Public Safety Officers' Benefits Act", 34 U.S.C. sec. 10281 et seq.

The benefit provided pursuant to this section must be reduced by an amount equal to the amount of any federal educational benefits provided to the dependent.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 827, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 790, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(4) R&RE, (SB 19-174), ch. 170, p. 1980, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-5-111 as it existed prior to 1979.

23-3.3-205. Dependents of deceased or permanently disabled National Guardsman, law enforcement officer, or firefighter.

Any dependent of a person who died or was permanently disabled while on state active duty, federalized active duty, or authorized training duty as a Colorado National Guardsman or any dependent of any person who has been permanently disabled or killed while acting to preserve the public peace, health, and safety in the capacity of police officer, sheriff, or other law enforcement officer or firefighter or any dependent of a person, including a volunteer, who died or was permanently disabled while engaged in backcountry search and rescue activities, as defined in section

33-1-102

(1.3), upon being accepted for enrollment into any state institution, shall be permitted to pursue studies leading toward his or her first bachelor's degree or certificate of completion, free of tuition and free of room and board charges of the institution, for so long as said dependent achieves and maintains a cumulative grade point average of 2.5 or above based upon a 4.0 scale, but said benefits shall not be extended beyond six years from the date of enrollment. Such dependents pursuing studies at a nonpublic institution of higher education within the state of Colorado shall be eligible for assistance not to exceed the average cost of undergraduate instruction calculated for a full-time equivalent student at a comparable state institution for the previous year, and the average cost of room and board calculated for a full-time equivalent student at all state institutions for the previous year. Such dependents pursuing studies at an out-of-state institution of higher education shall be eligible for assistance not to exceed the average cost of undergraduate instruction calculated for a full-time equivalent student at a comparable state institution for the previous year. The commission shall provide tuition and, if appropriate, room and board assistance to such qualified students from appropriated student financial assistance funds.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1719, § 1, effective June 1, 2000.)

(1.5) Repealed.

A qualified dependent may receive benefits pursuant to this section prior to receiving federal educational benefits available to dependents pursuant to the federal "Public Safety Officers' Benefits Act", 34 U.S.C. sec. 10281 et seq.

The benefit provided pursuant to this section must be reduced by an amount equal to the amount of any federal educational benefits provided to the dependent.

An individual who was permanently disabled while on state active duty, federalized active duty, or authorized training duty as a Colorado National Guardsman is permanently disabled for the purpose of determining eligibility of dependents to qualify for educational benefits if such individual is ineligible for retention as a member of the National Guard and is unable to engage in any substantial full-time gainful activity by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted for a continuous period of not less than twelve months and exists at the time the dependent seeks entry into an institution.

An individual who has been permanently disabled while acting to preserve the public peace, health, and safety in the capacity of police officer, sheriff, or other law enforcement officer or firefighter is permanently disabled for the purpose of determining eligibility of dependents to qualify for educational benefits if such individual is, as a result of the disability, unable to perform in the position to which he or she was regularly assigned at the time he or she became disabled.

An individual who has been permanently disabled while engaged in backcountry search and rescue activities, as defined in section 33-1-102 (1.3), is permanently disabled for the purpose of determining eligibility of dependents to qualify for educational benefits if the individual is, as a result of the disability, unable to perform in the position to which the individual was regularly assigned at the time the individual became disabled, or, if the individual was engaged in backcountry search and rescue activities as a volunteer, is unable to engage in any substantial full-time gainful activity by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment that can be expected to result in death or that has lasted for a continuous period of not less than twelve months and exists at the time the dependent seeks entry into an institution.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 828, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 81:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1093, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 83:

(1) and (3)(a) amended, p. 790, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) and (3)(a) amended, p. 548, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 97:

(1) and (3)(b) amended, p. 1014, § 22, effective August 6.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 210, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2000:

(1) amended and (1.5) repealed, p. 1719, §§ 1, 2, effective June 1.

L. 2019:

(2) R&RE, (SB 19-174), ch. 170, p. 1980, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended and (3)(c) added, (SB 22-168), ch. 296, p. 2120, § 5, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-5-111.5 as it existed prior to 1979.